Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. Provisions Relating to Interstate Agreement on Qualifications of Educational Personnel

§ 2061.
Powers of Secretary of Education.

The “designated State official” for this State shall be the Secretary of Education. The Secretary shall enter into contracts pursuant to Article III of the Agreement only with the approval of the specific text thereof by the State Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 8

, § 2;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 177, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 2062.
Repealed. 2003, No. 122 (Adj. Sess.), § 294(w)(3).